Hawaii statutes.
§381-6 Powers of board; evidence,
witnesses; process by mail, etc. The emergency board may hold hearings at
any place within the State, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance,
compel the production of books and papers, administer oaths, take testimony,
and receive evidence.

In case of contumacy or refusal to obey a
subpoena issued to any person, the circuit court of any judicial circuit within
the jurisdiction of which the inquiry is carried on, upon application by the
board, shall have jurisdiction to issue an order requiring such person to
appear before the board, to compel the production of papers, to produce
evidence, or to give testimony touching the matter in question. Failure to
obey any such order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

Process and papers of the board may be served
either personally or by registered mail or by radiogram or by leaving a copy
thereof at the principal office or place of business of the person to be
served. Return by the individual serving the same setting forth the manner of
the service, return post office receipt or radiogram receipt shall be proof of
service of the same. [L 1949, c 146, pt of §1; RL 1955, §91-7; HRS §381-6]

Cross References

Mailing of process, see §1-28.

Oaths, subpoenas, see §§1-21, 92-16, 603-21.9, 621-1, and 621-12.

Rules of Court

Oaths, subpoenas, see HRCP rules 43(d), 45.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next